en: Tuna pizzas, Tuna pizza
bg: Пица с риба тон
de: Thunfischpizzen
es: Pizzas con atún
fi: Tonnikalapizzat
fr: Pizzas au thon, Pizza au thon
hr: Pizze od tune
lt: Picos su tunu
nl: Tonijnpizzas
pt: Pizzas de atum

en: Seafood pizza
bg: Пица с моркси дарове
fr: Pizza aux fruits de mer
hr: Pizza s plodovima mora
lt: Picos su jūros gėrybėmis

en: Salmon pizza
bg: Пица със сьомга
fr: Pizza au saumon
hr: Pizza sa lososom
lt: Picos su lašiša

en: Bolognese pizzas, Pizza bolognese-style with meat
de: Pizza Bolognese
es: Pizza boloñesa
fi: Jauhelihapizzat
fr: Pizzas à la bolognaise, Pizzas bolognaise, Pizza à la viande type bolognaise
hr: Bolonjez pizze
lt: Bolonijos picos
nl: Bolognesepizzas

en: Goat cheese and bacon pizzas, Goat cheese pizza with lardoons
fr: Pizzas chèvre-lardons, Pizza au chèvre et lardons
hr: Pizze od kozjeg sira i slanine
lt: Picos su ožkų sūriu ir bekonu
nl: Geitenkaas-spekpizzas

en: Pizza with truffle
bg: Пица с трюфел
fr: Pizzas à la truffe
hr: Pizza s tartufima
lt: Picos su valgomais trumais
nl: Truffelpizzas

en: Ham pizzas
bg: Пица с шунка
de: Schinkenpizzas
es: Pizzas de jamón york
fi: kinkkupizzat
fr: Pizzas au jambon, Pizza au jambon
hr: Pizze sa šunkom
it: Pizze al prosciutto
lt: Picos su kumpiu
nl: Hampizza

en: Cured ham pizza
fr: Pizza au jambon cru
hr: Pizza sa suhom šunkom
lt: Picos su vytintu kumpiu

en: Speck pizza
fr: Pizza au speck

en: Kebab pizzas, Kebab pizza
de: Pizza Kebab, Pizza Kebap, Dönerpizza
fr: Pizzas au kebab, Pizza au kebab, Pizzas kebab
hr: Kebab pizze
lt: Picos su kebabu
nl: Pizza kebab

en: Vegetable pizza, Four seasons pizza, Pizza quattro stagioni
es: Pizzas de verduras
fi: Kasvispizza, Quattro stagioni -pizza
fr: Pizzas aux légumes, Pizza 4 saisons, Pizza quatre saisons, pizza aux légumes, pizzas 4 saisons, pizza quatre saisons
hr: Pizza s povrćem
lt: Picos su daržovėmis, Keturių sezonų picos
nl: Groentepizza, Groentenpizza

en: Cheese pizzas
bg: Пица със сирена
de: Käsepizzas
es: Pizzas de queso
fi: juustopizzat
fr: Pizzas au fromage, Pizza au fromage
hr: Pizze sa sirom
it: Pizze al formaggio
lt: Picos su sūriu
nl: Kaaspizzas
pl: Pizza z serem, Pizze z serem
pt: Pizas de queijo
sv: Ostpizzor

en: Three Cheese Pizza
bg: Пица с три сирена
de: Drei-Käse-Pizza
es: Pizza tres quesos
fi: kolmen juuston pizza
fr: Pizzas aux trois fromages, pizzas 3 fromages, Pizza aux trois fromages, pizza 3 fromages
hr: Pizza od tri sira
it: Pizza ai tre formaggi
lt: Picos su trijų rūšių sūriais
nl: Drie kazenpizzas
pl: Pizza 3 sery, Pizza trzy sery

en: Four Cheese Pizza
bg: Пица с четири сирена
de: Vier-Käse-Pizza
es: Pizza de cuatro quesos
fi: Neljän juuston pizza
fr: Pizzas aux quatre fromages, pizzas 4 fromages, Pizza aux quatre fromages, pizza 4 fromages
hr: Pizza s četiri sira
it: Pizza ai quattro formaggi
lt: Picos su keturių rūšių sūriais
nl: Vierkazenpizzas
pl: Pizza 4 sery, Pizza cztery sery
pt: Pizas de quatro queijos

en: Five Cheese Pizza
de: Fünf-Käse-Pizza
fr: Pizzas aux cinq fromages, pizzas 5 fromages, Pizza aux cinq fromages, pizza 5 fromages
hr: Pizza s pet sireva
it: Pizze ai cinque formaggi
lt: Picos su penkių rūšių sūriais
nl: Vijf kazen pizza
pl: Pizza 5 serów, Pizza pięć serów

en: Six Cheese Pizza
fr: Pizzas aux six fromages, pizzas 6 fromages, Pizza aux six fromages, pizza 6 fromages
hr: Pizza sa šest sireva
lt: Picos su šešių rūšių sūriais
pl: Pizza 6 serów, Pizza sześć serów

en: Cheese and onion pizza with lardoons
fr: Pizza aux lardons oignons et fromage
hr: Pizza od sira i luka s pečenjem
lt: Picos su šonine, sūriu ir svogūnais

en: Pizza with raclette cheese and lardoons, Pizza with tartiflette cheese and lardoons
fr: Pizza type raclette, Pizza type tartiflette, Pizza à la montagnarde, Pizzas raclette
hr: Pizza s raclette sirom i pečenicama
lt: Picos su rakletė sūriu ir šonine, Picos su tartifletė sūriu ir šonine

en: Oval pizzas, oval pizza
fr: Pizzas ovales, Pizza ovale
hr: Ovalne pizze
it: Pizze ovali
lt: Ovalios picos
nl: Ovale pizzas

en: Low-fat prepared meals
fr: Plats préparés à faible teneur en matières grasses
hr: Nemasna pripremljena jela
lt: Mažai riebūs paruošti patiekalai, Paruošti patiekalai su mažai riebalų
nl: Kant-en-klaarmaaltijden met minder vet